Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202619-5803
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Poverty Elimination Action Plan Act:

(1) City means any city of the metropolitan class or city of the primary class;

(2) Economic redevelopment area means an area in the State of Nebraska in which:

(a) The average rate of unemployment in the area during the period covered by the most recent federal decennial census or American Community Survey 5-Year Estimate by the United States Bureau of the Census is at least one hundred fifty percent of the average rate of unemployment in the state during the same period; and

(b) The average poverty rate in the area is twenty percent or more for the federal census tract in the area;

(3) High-poverty area means an area consisting of one or more contiguous census tracts, as determined by the most recent federal decennial census, which contain a percentage of persons with incomes below the poverty line of greater than thirty percent, and all census tracts contiguous to such tract or tracts, as determined by the most recent federal decennial census; and

(4) Qualified census tract means a qualified census tract as defined in 26 U.S.C. 42(d)(5)(B)(ii)(I), as such section existed on January 1, 2024.

Laws 2024, LB840, § 3.